Illinois, session 104th, SB3961.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Dignity for Aborted Children Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Abortion" has the meaning provided in Section 1-10 of the 8Reproductive Health Act.9    "Department" means the Department of Public Health.10    "Human fetal tissue" means tissue obtained from a dead 11human embryo or fetus after a spontaneous or induced abortion 12or after a stillbirth.13    "Physician" means any person licensed to practice medicine 14in all its branches under the Medical Practice Act of 1987. 15    Section 10. Disposal of human fetal tissue; informed 16consent.17    (a) Notwithstanding any State law or administrative rule 18to the contrary, any physician, after performing an abortion 19in this State, shall provide the patient with an informed 20consent form, provided by the Department, offering the patient 21the following options for disposal of the human fetal tissue 22from the abortion:  SB3961- 2 -LRB104 18705 BDA 32148 b1        (1) The patient may take possession of the human fetal 2    tissue and may choose to transfer the tissue to an entity 3    providing interment or cremation.4        (2) The patient may elect to release the human fetal 5    tissue to the physician, who shall be subject to the 6    requirements of subsection (b), except that the option 7    described in this paragraph shall not be available if the 8    patient does not expel the human fetal tissue at the 9    premises of the physician performing the abortion.10    (b) A physician described in subsection (a) shall:11        (1) obtain a patient signature on each consent form 12    required under subsection (a); and13        (2) retain each consent form in the patient's file. 14    Section 15. Physician disposal. 15    (a) It is unlawful for any physician, after performing an 16abortion in this State in which the patient elects to release 17the human fetal tissue to the physician under paragraph (2) of 18subsection (a) of Section 10, to fail to provide for the final 19disposition of the human fetal tissue through interment or 20cremation, consistent with State law regarding the disposal of 21human remains, not later than 7 days after the date on which 22the abortion procedure was performed.23    (b) The final disposition of human fetal tissue under 24paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Section 10 may be carried 25out through interment or cremation of tissue from more than   SB3961- 3 -LRB104 18705 BDA 32148 b1one abortion procedure collectively. 2    Section 20. Physician reports; reports of persons to whom 3human fetal tissue is transferred.4    (a) A physician described in subsection (a) of Section 10 5shall submit annual reports to the Department indicating, with 6respect to the annual reporting period:7        (1) the aggregate number of abortion procedures 8    performed by the physician;9        (2) the gestational age of the fetus at the time of 10    each procedure; and11        (3) for abortions carried out using an abortion method 12    other than chemical abortion:13            (A) the aggregate number of human embryos or 14        fetuses for which the physician provides for final 15        disposition through interment or cremation, other than 16        by releasing the human fetal tissue to a patient under 17        paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Section 10;18            (B) the aggregate number of human embryos or 19        fetuses released to patients; and20            (C) the identity of each person, not including the 21        patient, to whom the physician transfers human fetal 22        tissue for final disposition.23    (b) If, during the reporting period under subsection (a), 24a physician transfers human fetal tissue to another person, 25not including the patient, for final disposition through   SB3961- 4 -LRB104 18705 BDA 32148 b1interment or cremation, the person shall submit a report to 2the Department for the annual reporting period specifying:3        (1) the aggregate number of human embryos or fetuses 4    transferred to the person; and5        (2) how the person disposed of the human fetal tissue.  6    Section 25. Penalties; violations; patient exemption.7    (a) Any physician who fails to maintain the documentation 8required under subsection (b) of Section 10 shall be subject 9to a civil penalty in an amount not less than $1,000 per 10violation and not exceeding $50,000 per violation.11    (b) Any physician who violates Section 15 is guilty of a 12Class A misdemeanor.13    (c) Any physician who violates subsection (a) of Section 1420 is guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.15    (d) A violation described under subsection (a), (b), or 16(c) shall result in the matter also being considered for 17action by the Illinois State Medical Board on its authority.18    (e) A patient upon whom an abortion is performed or 19attempted in violation of this Act may not be prosecuted under 20this Act or for a conspiracy to violate this Act.  21    Section 30. Department annual reports. The Department 22shall submit to the General Assembly an annual report on the 23number of abortions, procedure type, and method of disposal of 24human fetal tissue under this Act.